Missouri, session 2026, SB1157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 324.1173, to read as
follows:
324.1173. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, for purposes of obtaining a
professional or occupational license, a person has
demonstrated lawful presence and is eligible to obtain a
professional or occupational license if the person submits:
(1) An unexpired employment authorization document
issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security,
Form I-766; and
(2) Documentation issued by the United States
Department of Homeland Security, the United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services, or any other federal
agency, including a Form I-797 used by the United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services, demonstrating that
such person is described in Section 202(c)(2)(B)(i) through
(ix) of the federal REAL ID Act of 2005, Pub. L. 109-13.
2. A professional or occupational license issued to a
person eligible pursuant to subsection 1 of this section

SB 1157 2
shall be valid only for the period of time during which such
person's employment authorization document is valid.
3. Nothing in this section shall affect the
requirements to obtain a professional or occupational
license that are unrelated to the lawful presence
requirements demonstrated pursuant to this section.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant
eligibility for any public benefits other than obtaining a
professional or occupational license.
5. Any person who has complied with the requirements
of this section shall have his or her employment
authorization document verified through the Systematic Alien
Verification for Entitlements Program operated by the United
States Department of Homeland Security or an equivalent
program designated by the United States Department of
Homeland Security.
6. The general assembly enacts this section pursuant
to the authority provided in 8 U.S.C. Section 1621(d), as
such section existed on August 28, 2026.
✓